Utah statutes.
48-2e-803.   Rescinding dissolution.

(1)  A limited partnership may rescind its dissolution, unless a statement of termination applicable to the limited partnership is effective, the district court has entered an order under Subsection 48-2e-801(1)(f) dissolving the limited partnership, or the division has dissolved the limited partnership under Section 48-2e-810.

(2)  Rescinding dissolution under this section requires:

(a)  the affirmative vote or consent of each partner; and

(b)  if the limited partnership has delivered to the division for filing an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership stating that the partnership is dissolved and if:

(i)  the amendment is not effective, the filing by the limited partnership of a statement of withdrawal under Section 48-2e-207 applicable to the amendment; or

(ii)  the amendment is effective, the delivery by the limited partnership to the division for filing of an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership stating that the dissolution has been rescinded under this section.

(3)  If a limited partnership rescinds its dissolution:

(a)  the limited partnership resumes carrying on its activities and affairs as if dissolution had never occurred;

(b)  subject to Subsection (3)(c), any liability incurred by the limited partnership after the dissolution and before the rescission is effective is determined as if dissolution had never occurred; and

(c)  the rights of a third party arising out of conduct in reliance on the dissolution before the third party knew or had notice of the rescission may not be adversely affected.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

